Florida, session 2026, SB1748.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âSection 790.3315, Florida Statutes, is created 14 to read: 15 790.3315âEvidence in certain civil actions relating to 16 firearms.â 17 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 18 (a)ââAuthorized user recognition technologyâ means a 19 mechanism, device, or technology applied to a firearm which 20 prevents an unauthorized user from firing the firearm. 21 (b)ââExternal manual safetyâ means a manually operated 22 mechanism that, when engaged, blocks the trigger from 23 functioning. 24 (c)ââFirearmâ has the same meaning as in s. 790.001. 25 (d)ââLoaded chamber indicatorâ means a mechanism or feature 26 intended to indicate to the firearm user that a cartridge is in 27 the firing chamber of the firearm. 28 (e)ââMagazine disconnect mechanismâ means a mechanism that 29 prevents a semiautomatic firearm from firing when the detachable 30 magazine is not fully inserted in the firearm. 31 (2)âFor purposes of a product liability action involving a 32 firearm, evidence of a defective product design, negligence, a 33 duty to warn, strict liability, or evidence to support similar 34 claims may not include the absence of any of the following 35 mechanisms or features: 36 (a)âAn authorized user recognition technology. 37 (b)âAn external mechanical safety, including, but not 38 limited to, a hinged, pivoting, or tabbed trigger safety. 39 (c)âA loaded chamber indicator. 40 (d)âA magazine disconnect mechanism. 41 (e)âAny mechanism or feature that would perform the same 42 function as a mechanism or feature described in paragraphs (a) 43 (d). 44 (3)âThis section may not be construed to limit liability 45 for a firearm manufacturer in cases where the claimant 46 establishes that the firearm contained an actual manufacturing 47 or design defect or failed to operate in a manner consistent 48 with the manufacturerâs express warranty or representations. 49 (4)âThis section applies to causes of action accruing on or 50 after July 1, 2026. 51 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.